Missouri, session 2026, SB1487.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Section 67.641, RSMo, is repealed and one new
section enacted in lieu thereof, to be known as section 67.641,
to read as follows:
67.641. 1. (1) The general assembly may annually
appropriate up to three million dollars from the state
general revenue fund to each convention and sports complex
fund created pursuant to section 67.639, provided that for
an existing sports facility located in a first class county
with a charter form of government which contains part of a
city having a population of three hundred fifty thousand
inhabitants or more or any city with a population greater
than three hundred fifty thousand, located in more than one
county, such county or city has entered into a contract or
lease with a professional sports team affiliated with or
franchised by the National Football League, the National
Basketball Association, the National Hockey League, or the
American League or the National League of Major League
Baseball. No moneys shall be transferred pursuant to this
section to the benefit of a sports complex for a county in
any year unless each professional sports team which leases

SB 1487 2
playing facilities within the county continue to lease the
same playing facilities which were leased on August 28,
1989. Each convention and sports complex fund shall be
administered by the county or city and used to carry out the
provisions of sections 67.638 to 67.645.
(2) Any professional sports team that leases a sports
facility pursuant to this section and that announces that
such professional sports team is relocating to another state
shall impose a surcharge of fifty dollars for each ticket
sold for a sporting event hosted by such professional sports
team, as well as a surcharge of five percent on every sale
made within the sports facility during a sporting event
hosted by such professional sports team.
2. Each city or county which has a convention and
sports complex fund established pursuant to the laws of this
state which administers a convention and sports complex
fund, prior to receipt of any appropriations pursuant to
this section shall enact or promulgate ordinances, or rules
and regulations which provide, pursuant to the terms and
provisions of section 70.859, for the purchase of goods and
services and for construction of capital improvements for
the sports complex. In no event shall more than three
million dollars be transferred from the state to any one
such convention and sports complex fund in any fiscal year
pursuant to this section, and in no event shall any moneys
be transferred from the state to any convention and sports
complex fund for the planning, development, construction,
maintenance or operation of any facility after June 30,
1999. Only one such transfer of state funds shall be made
to any convention and sports complex fund after June 30,
1997, provided that any convention and sports complex fund
which was appropriated state moneys prior to July 1, 1997,

SB 1487 3
for the construction, maintenance or operation of a facility
shall continue to receive state moneys, subject to
appropriation.
3. This section shall not become effective unless and
until the applicable county or the applicable city which has
created a convention and sports complex fund has commenced
paying into the convention and sports complex fund amounts
at a rate sufficient for the county or city to contribute
the sum of three million dollars per calendar year, except
that this section shall become effective with respect to any
first class county not having a charter form of government
on August 28, 1989, and with respect to any charter city
located in a first class county not having a charter form of
government at the time at which such county or city has
commenced paying any moneys into its convention and sports
complex fund. The appropriations made pursuant to
subsection 1 of this section to any convention and sports
complex fund shall not exceed the amounts contributed by the
county or city to the fund. The county or city's
proportional amount specified in this section may come from
any source. Once the county or city has commenced paying
such appropriate proportional amounts into its convention
and sports complex fund, the county or city shall so notify
the state treasurer and the director of revenue and,
thereafter, subject to annual appropriation, transfers shall
commence and continue each month pursuant to this section
until such monthly transfers are made for forty years.
Moneys appropriated from general revenue shall not be
expended until such first class charter county or a city
located in such first class charter county has paid three
million dollars into its fund, or until such first class
county not having a charter form of government or until such

SB 1487 4
charter city within a first class county not having a
charter form of government has commenced payment of moneys
into its fund.
✓